test/src/morphology/P-tama_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - tuo - ei tsekattu : # Pronoun 'dette'
     tämä+Pron+Dem+Sg+Nom: tämä
     tämä+Pron+Dem+Sg+Gen: tämän
     tämä+Pron+Dem+Sg+Par: tätä
     tämä+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ess: tänä
     tämä+Pron+Dem+Sg+Tra: täksi
     tämä+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ine: tässä
     tämä+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ela: tästä
     tämä+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ill: tähään
     tämä+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ade: tällä
     tämä+Pron+Dem+Sg+Abl: tältä
     tämä+Pron+Dem+Sg+All: tälle

     tuo+Pron+Dem+Sg+Nom: tuo
     tuo+Pron+Dem+Sg+Gen: tuon
     tuo+Pron+Dem+Sg+Par: tuota
     tuo+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ess: tuona
     tuo+Pron+Dem+Sg+Tra: tuoksi
     tuo+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ine: tuossa
     tuo+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ela: tuosta
     tuo+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ill: tuohoon
     tuo+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ade: tuolla
     tuo+Pron+Dem+Sg+Abl: tuolta
     tuo+Pron+Dem+Sg+All: tuolle
     
